District of Columbia statutes.
10-505.03

Transfer of member of Metropolitan Police to Capitol Police — Creditable service as congressional employee.

(a)

Any police service: (1) of the Capitol Police Chief shall be treated, effective on the effective date of this part; and (2) of a member of the Metropolitan Police force transferred to the Capitol Police under § 10-505.02(b) shall be treated, effective on the effective date of such transfer; as creditable service as a Congressional employee for purposes of determining eligibility for, and the amount of, an annuity under subchapter III of Chapter 83 of Title 5, United States Code.

(b)

Effective on the date on which police service is first treated as creditable service as a Congressional employee under subsection (a) of this section, the individual or member involved shall forfeit all annuity rights under the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act (§ 5-701 et seq.).

History

Dec. 20, 1979, 93 Stat. 1099, Pub. L. 96-152, § 3

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-505.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-118.